Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6402
Purpose of act.

It is the purpose of the Building Construction Act to:

(1) Adopt a state building code to govern the construction, reconstruction, alteration, and repair of buildings and other structures within Nebraska;

(2) Provide state standards to safeguard life, health, property, and the public welfare by regulating and controlling the design, construction, quality of materials, use and occupancy, and maintenance of buildings and structures within this state; and

(3) Provide for the use of modern and innovative methods, devices, materials, and techniques in the design and construction of buildings and other structures.

Laws 1987, LB 227, § 2.